Utah statutes.
73-20-2.   Definitions.

As used in this act:

(1)  "Advisory board" means the Agricultural Advisory Board created by Section 4-2-7.

(2)  "Board" means the Board of Water Resources created by Section 73-10-1.5.

(3)  "Commercial farm" means a tract or tracts of land with or without improvements recognized as a farm or ranch in this state which is owned and operated or leased and operated by the applicant, and used in the production and raising of basic livestock.

(4)  "Farmer" means any person who owns and operates or leases and operates a commercial farm in this state, and includes individuals, partnerships and corporations.

(5)  "Basic livestock" means a herd of cattle, sheep, or swine kept and maintained primarily for breeding purposes.

